Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-3804
Kratom product; manufacture; acts prohibited.

No person shall produce, manufacture, distribute, offer for sale, sell, or introduce into commerce a kratom product in the State of Nebraska if the product is manufactured in a manner that is attractive to children.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 4.